District of Columbia statutes.
2-1591

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Interagency Collaboration and Services Integration Commission Establishment Act of 2007”.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 501, 54 DCR 4102

Editor's Notes

Applicability: Section 508 of Law 17-9 provided that this title this subchapter shall apply upon Congressional enactment of Title IX. Congress enacted the provisions of Title IX in Pub. L. 110-33, approved June 1, 2007.